District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1171.05

Criminal penalties.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-335, § 6, 58 DCR 599
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-80, § 2(e), 61 DCR 169

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) repeal of this section, see § 2(e) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-4, May 18, 2013, 60 DCR 4624, 20 DCSTAT 1268).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 2(e) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-25, March 7, 2013, 60 DCR 3986, 20 DCSTAT 485).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 2(e) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-231, December 20, 2013, 61 DCR 3, 20 DCSTAT 2633).